Utah statutes.
73-3c-301.   Application to the Water Quality Board.

(1)  A public agency proposing a water reuse project shall apply to the Water Quality Board created by Section 19-1-106.

(2)  The Water Quality Board may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, governing the consideration and approval of water reuse applications and administration of water reuse construction and operating permits.

(3)  Rules created under Subsection (2) shall require that water reuse meet standards and requirements for water quality set by the Water Quality Board in accordance with Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act.

(4)  The Water Quality Board shall issue a written decision for each water reuse application.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

